Washington statutes.
RCW 1.70.040

Authentication of official electronic record.

An official publisher of legal material in an electronic record that is designated as official under RCW 1.70.030 shall authenticate the record. To authenticate an electronic record, the publisher shall provide a method for a user to determine that the record received by the user from the publisher is unaltered from the official record published by the publisher.

[ 2017 c 106 s 5.]